apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON AcronymStem/Ä
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hän	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/ö
	AcronymStem/Ö	;

LEXICON AcronymStem/Ö
	AcronymStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hön	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;



! superlative returns to noun lexicon to avoid infinite superlative loops
LEXICON AdjectiveStem/Superlative
[CMP=SUP]:{AV-}i	kotus_36_NOUN/stemfiller		;

! comparative returns to NOUN lexicon because we do not want to allow infinite
! comparative loops
LEXICON AdjectiveStem/Comparative
[CMP=CMP]:m{AV-}{p~~}{H}	kotus_16_NOUN/stemfiller		;


LEXICON kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_2_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller	;
	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_3_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;
	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_4_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_4_NOUN/stemfiller	;
	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:i	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

! LEXICON kotus_6_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
! [CMP=POS]:0	kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller	;
! 0:i	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
! 0:e	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:i	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

! LEXICON kotus_7_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
! [CMP=POS]:0	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
! 0:i	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
! 0:e	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_8_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller	;
	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_9_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aäe}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{oö}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aäe}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_11_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_11_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_12_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_13_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_13_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_14_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_14_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_15_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_15_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_16_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_16_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_17_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_17_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_18_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_18_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_20_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_20_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_21_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_21_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_26_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_26_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_27_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_27_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{t~~}e{F}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:s	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_32_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_32_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_33_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_33_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}me	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}m	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_34_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_34_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}m	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_35_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_35_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}m{aä}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}m	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_36_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_36_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_37_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_37_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:m{p~~}{aä}{H}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:m{p~~}{H}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:se	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:s	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;


LEXICON kotus_39_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_39_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:kse	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:ks	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_40_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{t~~}e{F} AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:ks	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stub
iankaikkinen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:iankaikki	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kaltainen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:kaltai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
laillinen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:lailli	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
onnellinen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:onnelli	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
saksalainen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:saksalai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
terveellinen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:terveelli	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
varovainen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:varovai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ajankohtainen'][POS=ADJECTIVE][KTN=38]:ajan{#}kohtai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
LEXICON Suffixes
voipa'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=10][KAV=E]:voi{p~~}{^a}{E}	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
aatteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:aattei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
aloitteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:aloittei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
asteelainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:asteelai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
enteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:entei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
hammasteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:hammastei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
harteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:hartei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
hetkinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:hetki	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
holvinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:holvi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ikkunainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:ikkunai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
joukkueinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:joukkuei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kaikuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kaikui	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kansinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kansi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kattoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kattoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kielinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kieli	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kirjoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kirjoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
korkoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:korkoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kukintainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kukintai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kupeinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kupei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
kykyinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:kykyi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
käsitteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:käsittei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
laivainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:laivai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
laskoksinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:laskoksi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
lentoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:lentoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
liikkeinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:liikkei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
luustoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:luustoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
maineinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:mainei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
mittakaavainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:mittakaavai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
napainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:napai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
nilkkainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:nilkkai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
näytöksinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:näytöksi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
ompeleinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:ompelei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
painotteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:painottei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
penninen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:penni	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
piippuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:piippui	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
pukuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:pukui	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
raajainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:raajai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
runkoinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:runkoi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
sieraiminen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:sieraimi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
solkinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:solki	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
sylinterinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:sylinteri	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tavuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:tavui	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
tuloksinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:tuloksi	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vahvisteinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:vahvistei	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vastuinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:vastui	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
vuokrainen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:vuokrai	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
jäseninen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:#}jäseni	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
sylinterinen'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=38]:#}sylinteri	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller	;
